Illinois, session 104th, HB5466.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Behavioral Health Care 5Professional Loan Repayment Program Act is amended by changing 6Sections 10 and 30 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 996/10)8    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:9    "Behavioral health professional" means a professional 10engaged in the delivery of behavioral health, mental health, 11or substance use disorder treatment or services. 12    "Commission" means the Illinois Student Assistance 13Commission.14    "Physician" means a person licensed by this State to 15practice medicine in all its branches and includes any person 16holding a temporary license, as provided in the Medical 17Practice Act of 1987.18    "Program" means the Community Behavioral Health Care 19Professional Loan Repayment Program.20    "Psychiatrist" or "licensed psychiatrist" means a 21physician who has successfully completed a residency program 22in psychiatry accredited by either the Accreditation Council 23for Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic   HB5466 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20003 LNS 33454 b1Association. 2(Source: P.A. 100-862, eff. 1-1-19.) 3    (110 ILCS 996/30)4    Sec. 30. Eligibility; work requirement. 5    (a) To be eligible for assistance under the Community 6Behavioral Health Care Professional Loan Repayment Program, 7the Commission must find that the applicant satisfies all of 8the following:9        (1) He or she is a United States citizen or an eligible 10    noncitizen. 11        (2) He or she is a resident of this State.12        (3) At the time of application, he He or she is 13    currently working has worked for at least 12 consecutive 14    months as a behavioral health professional in a community 15    mental health center, behavioral health clinic, substance 16    use treatment center, or State-operated psychiatric 17    hospital licensed or certified by the Department of Human 18    Services or the Department of Healthcare and Family 19    Services in an underserved or rural federally designated 20    Mental Health Professional Shortage Area in this State.21        (4) He or she is a borrower with an outstanding 22    balance due on an educational loan.23        (5) He or she has not defaulted on an educational 24    loan.25    (b) The Commission may grant preference to a previous   HB5466 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20003 LNS 33454 b1recipient of a grant under the Program, provided that the 2recipient continues to meet the eligibility requirements under 3this Section.4    (c) A recipient of a grant under the Program must complete 5a separate 12-month period working in a community mental 6health center in an underserved or rural federally designated 7Mental Health Professional Shortage Area in this State 8following his or her initial application for this grant. An 9applicant seeking a renewal award in a subsequent year must be 10employed by a facility identified in paragraph (3) of 11subsection (a) at the time of application and must provide 12evidence of continuous employment for the 12 months that 13precede the application for renewal for each grant that he or 14she is awarded.15(Source: P.A. 103-56, eff. 7-1-24.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172026.